District of Columbia statutes.
32-517

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter within 90 days from October 3, 1990. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(b)

The proposed rules shall include standards for:

(1)

The definition of the term “family member”;

(2)

The reasonable notice that an employee who seeks to take family or medical leave shall give to an employer; and

(3)

The administrative enforcement procedure.

Oct. 3, 1990, D.C. Law 8-181, § 18, 37 DCR 5043
Family and Medical Leave Act Rulemaking Approval Resolution of 1991: Pursuant to Resolution 9-64, effective June 14, 1991, the Council approved proposed rules to implement the District of Columbia Family and Medical Leave Act of 1990.
1981 Ed., § 36-1317.